Utah statutes.
32B-6-202.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1) (a)  "Grandfathered bar structure" means a bar structure in a licensed premises of a full-service restaurant licensee that:

(i)  as of May 11, 2009, has:

(A)  patron seating at the bar structure;

(B)  a partition at one or more locations on the bar structure that is along:

(I)  the width of the bar structure; or

(II)  the length of the bar structure; and

(C)  facilities for the dispensing or storage of an alcoholic product:

(I)  on the portion of the bar structure that is separated by the partition described in Subsection (1)(a)(i)(B); or

(II)  if the partition as described in Subsection (1)(a)(i)(B)(II) is adjacent to the bar structure in a manner visible to a patron sitting at the bar structure;

(ii)  is not operational as of May 12, 2009, if:

(A)  a person applying for a full-service restaurant license:

(I)  has as of May 12, 2009, a building permit to construct the restaurant;

(II)  is as of May 12, 2009, actively engaged in the construction of the restaurant, as defined by rule made by the commission; and

(III)  is issued the full-service restaurant license by no later than December 31, 2009; and

(B)  once constructed, the licensed premises has a bar structure described in Subsection (1)(a)(i);

(iii)  as of May 12, 2009, has no patron seating at the bar structure; or

(iv)  is not operational as of May 12, 2009, if:

(A)  a person applying for a full-service restaurant license:

(I)  has as of May 12, 2009, a building permit to construct the restaurant;

(II)  is as of May 12, 2009, actively engaged in the construction of the restaurant, as defined by rule made by the commission; and

(III)  is issued a full-service restaurant license by no later than December 31, 2009; and

(B)  once constructed, the licensed premises has a bar structure with no patron seating.

(b)  "Grandfathered bar structure" does not include a grandfathered bar structure described in Subsection (1)(a) on or after the day on which a restaurant remodels the grandfathered bar structure, as defined by rule made by the commission.

(c)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b), a grandfathered bar structure remains a grandfathered bar structure notwithstanding whether a restaurant undergoes a change of ownership.

(2)  "Seating grandfathered bar structure" means:

(a)  a grandfathered bar structure described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) or (ii); or

(b)  a bar structure grandfathered under Section 32B-6-409.

